Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-604
Notice to Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature; hearing.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall notify the chairperson and members of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature prior to submitting any request or application to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Department of Health and Human Services for a demonstration project waiver under section 1115 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1315. Such notification shall be made electronically and shall include a copy of any documentation presented to the public related to the waiver. The Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature shall hold a public hearing on such waiver application during the period for public comment required under 42 C.F.R. 431.408.

Laws 2019, LB468, § 3.